Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1319
Board; appeal; procedure.

Appeal from the decision of the State Personnel Board shall be in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act.

Laws 1969, c. 802, § 10, p. 3026;

Laws 1987, LB 19, § 4;

Laws 1988, LB 352, § 173.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.

State Administrative Procedures Act does not limit right of review to appeal procedure therein. Lanc v. Douglas County Welfare Administration, 189 Neb. 651, 204 N.W.2d 387 (1971).